District of Columbia statutes.
28-4504

Exclusions.

(a)

Labor of a human being is not a commodity or an article of commerce. Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to forbid the existence and operation of labor, agricultural or horticultural organizations, instituted for the purpose of mutual help, and not having capital stock or conducted for profit, or to forbid or restrain individual members of such organizations from lawfully carrying out the legitimate objects thereof; nor shall such organizations, or the members thereof, be held or construed to be illegal combinations or conspiracies in restraint of trade.

(b)

This chapter does not make illegal the activity of:

(1)

any non-profit corporation, trust, or organization established exclusively for religious, charitable, literary, or educational purposes to the extent that the activity is religious, charitable, literary, or educational; or

(2)

the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority.

Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-169, § 2, 27 DCR 5368
1981 Ed., § 28-4504.